en: Wines from Spain, Spanish wines
de: spanische Weine
es: Vinos de España, vinos españoles.
fi: espanjalaiset viinit
fr: Vins espagnols, Vin espagnol, Vin d'Espagne, Vins d'Espagne
hr: Vina iz Španjolske
hu: Spanyol borok
nl: Spaanse wijnen, Spaanse wijn, Wijn uit Spanje

en: Sherry
es: Jerez, Xérès, Sherry, Jerez-Xérès-Sherry

en: Sekt
xx: Sekt
de: Sekt
fr: Sekt
hr: Sekt
nl: Sekt

en: Champagnes, champagne
de: Champagner
es: Champán
fi: Samppanjat
fr: Champagnes, champagne, vins de Champagne
hr: Šampanjci
it: Champagne
ja: シャンパン, シャンパーニュ
nl: Champagnes, Champagne

en: French Champagnes, french Champagne
de: Französische Champagner
fi: Ranskalaiset samppanjat
fr: Champagnes français, champagne français
hr: Francuski šampanjci
nl: Franse champagnes, Franse Champagne, Champagne uit Frankrijk

en: Russian champagne, Soviet champagne
fr: Champagne russe, Champagne soviétique
hr: Ruski šampanjac
hu: Orosz pezsgők
nl: Russische champagnes

en: Beading wines, beading wine
fr: vins perlant, vin perlant, perlé

en: Sparkling fruit wine
fr: Pétillant de fruits

en: Fortified wines
de: Likörweine
fi: maustetut viinit
fr: Vins mutés, vin muté
hr: Pojačana vina
hu: Likőrborok, Likőrbor
it: Vini liquorosi
nl: Versterkte wijn, Versterkte wijnen
pt: Vinhos fortificados

fr: Porto, vins de Porto, vin de Porto
nl: Porten, Port

en: red ports
de: rote Portweine, rote Ports
fr: porto rouges, porto rouge
hr: Crvene luke
nl: Rode porten, Rode port

en: White Ports
fr: porto blancs, porto blanc
hr: Bijele luke
nl: Witte porten, Witte port

en: Sweet wines, natural sweet wines
de: Süßweine
es: Vinos dulces
fi: makeat viinit
fr: Vins doux, Vin doux, Vins doux naturels, Vin doux naturel
hr: Slatka vina
hu: Édes borok
it: Vini dolci
lt: Saldūs vynai, Natūralus saldus vynas
nl: Zoete wijnen, Zoete wijn

en: 11% white wine
fr: Vin blanc à 11°, Vin blanc à 11% d'alcool
zh: 11% 白葡萄酒

en: Dry white wines
de: Trockene Weißweine
fr: Vins blancs secs
hr: Suha bijela vina
hu: Száraz fehérborok

en: 11% dry white wine
fr: Vin blanc sec à 11°, Vin blanc sec à 11% d'alcool
zh: 11% 干白葡萄酒

en: Sparkling white wine
fr: Vin blanc mousseux

en: Sparkling red wine
fr: Vin rouge pétillant

en: Sparkling Rosé wine
fr: Vin rosé pétillant

en: White sparkling flavoured wines
fr: Vins blancs mousseux aromatisés